Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure.

History.

()

Effective dates. —

Section 10,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this article effective July 20, 2019, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 12, SLA 2019 (HB 78), relating to insurers corporate governance, see 2019 House Journal 0251 - 0252.

Sec. 21.09.400.
Corporate governance annual disclosure scope.

AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

do not prescribe or impose a corporate governance standard or internal procedure beyond that required under AS 10. Nothing in AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

limits the director’s authority or the rights or obligations of a third party.

AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

apply to an insurer domiciled in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.

Sec. 21.09.410.
Disclosure requirement.

An insurer, or an insurance group of which the insurer is a member, shall submit to the director not later than June 1 of each calendar year a corporate governance annual disclosure that contains the information described in AS

21.09.430(b)

. In the event the director requests an insurer to submit a disclosure under (c) of this section and the insurer is a member of an insurance group, the insurer shall submit the disclosure to the lead state insurance regulator of the insurance group, under the laws of the lead state, in accordance with the procedures set out in the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

A corporate governance annual disclosure must include a signature of the insurer’s or insurance group’s chief executive officer or corporate secretary attesting that, to the best of that individual’s belief and knowledge,

the insurer has implemented the corporate governance practices required under AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

; and

a copy of the corporate governance annual disclosure has been provided to the insurer’s board of directors or the appropriate committee of the board.

An insurer not required to submit a corporate governance annual disclosure under (a) of this section shall submit a disclosure upon request of the director.

For purposes of completing a corporate governance annual disclosure, an insurer or insurance group, depending on the insurer’s or insurance group’s corporate governance structure, may provide information regarding corporate governance at

the ultimate controlling parent level;

an intermediate holding company level;

the individual legal entity level; or

the ultimate controlling parent level, an intermediate holding company level, and the individual legal entity level.

An insurer or insurance group

is encouraged to make the corporate governance annual disclosure at the level at which

the insurer’s or insurance group’s risk appetite is determined;

the earnings, capital, liquidity, operations, and reputation of the insurer are overseen collectively and at which the supervision of those factors are coordinated and exercised; or

legal liability for failure of general corporate governance duties would be placed;

shall, if determining the level of reporting based on the criteria under this section,

indicate which of the three criteria under (1) of this subsection was used to determine the level of reporting; and

explain any subsequent change in the level of reporting.

A review of the corporate governance annual disclosure and any additional requests for information shall be made through the lead state in accordance with the procedures set out in the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

An insurer or insurance group providing information substantially similar to the information required under AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

in other documents provided to the director, including proxy statements filed in conjunction with Form B requirements under regulations of the division, or other state or federal filings provided to the division, is not required to duplicate that information in the corporate governance annual disclosure; however, the insurer or insurance group shall include in the disclosure a cross reference of the document in which the information is included.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.

Sec. 21.09.420.
Regulations and orders.

To carry out the provisions of AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

, the director may

adopt regulations, including regulations substantially similar to the regulations under the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Model Regulation; and

issue orders necessary to implement the provisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.

Sec. 21.09.430.
Contents of corporate governance annual disclosure.

An insurer or insurance group may have discretion in responding to a corporate governance annual disclosure inquiry if the insurer’s or insurance group’s disclosure contains the material necessary for the director to gain an understanding of the insurer’s or insurance group’s corporate governance structure, policies, and practices. The director may request additional information the director determines necessary for the director to have a clear understanding of the insurer’s or insurance group’s corporate governance policies, reporting or information system, or controls implementing those policies.

An insurer or insurance group shall prepare a corporate governance annual disclosure consistent with regulations adopted by the director under AS

21.09.420

. An insurer or insurance group shall maintain documents and supporting information used in preparing the insurer’s or insurance group’s disclosure and shall make the documents and supporting information available upon examination or request of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.

Sec. 21.09.440.
Confidentiality.

Documents, materials, or other information, including a corporate governance annual disclosure, in the possession or control of the division that are obtained by, created by, or disclosed to the director or any person under AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

are confidential and subject to the provisions of AS

21.06.060

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.

Sec. 21.09.450.
Agreements with National Association of Insurance Commissioners and third-party consultants.

The director may retain, at the insurer’s or insurance group’s expense and as consistent with this section, third-party consultants, including attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other experts not otherwise a part of the director’s staff, as may be reasonably necessary to assist the director in reviewing the insurer’s or insurance group’s corporate governance annual disclosure and related information or the insurer’s or insurance group’s compliance with AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

.

A person retained under (a) of this section is under the direction and control of the director and acts in a purely advisory capacity.

As part of the retention process, a third-party consultant must verify to the director in writing, with notice to the insurer or insurance group, that the consultant is free of a conflict of interest, has internal procedures in place to monitor compliance with a conflict, and will comply with the confidentiality standards and requirements under AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

.

A written agreement with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, a third-party consultant, or both, governing sharing and use of information provided under AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

must contain the following provisions and expressly require the written consent of the insurer or insurance group before making information under AS

21.09.400

—

21.09.460

public:

a provision stating that the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and third-party consultants are subject to the same confidentiality standards and requirements as the director under AS

21.22.120

and any other relevant law;

specific procedures and protocols for maintaining the confidentiality and security of information related to corporate governance annual disclosures that is shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant under AS 21.09.400 — 21.09.460;

procedures and protocols that ensure the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shares only with other state regulators from states in which the insurer or insurance group has domiciled insurers; the agreement must provide that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality of the documents, materials, or other information related to corporate governance annual disclosures and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

a provision specifying that ownership of information related to corporate governance annual disclosures that is shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or a third-party consultant remains with the division, and the use of the information by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant is subject to the direction of the director;

a provision that prohibits the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant from storing the information shared under AS 21.09.400 — 21.09.460 in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is completed;

a provision requiring the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant to provide prompt notice to the director and the insurer or insurance group regarding any subpoena, request for disclosure, or request for production of information related to the insurer’s or insurance group’s corporate governance annual disclosure;

a requirement that the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant consent to intervention by an insurer or insurance group in any judicial or administrative action in which the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant may be required to disclose confidential information about the insurer or insurance group shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or the third-party consultant under AS 21.09.400 — 21.09.460.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.

Sec. 21.09.460.
Penalties.

Each day an insurer or insurance group fails, without just cause, to file the corporate governance annual disclosure in the time required under AS

21.09.410(a)

, the insurer or insurance group shall pay $1,000, not to exceed $365,000. The director may reduce the penalty under this section if the insurer or insurance group demonstrates to the director that the imposition of the penalty is a financial hardship to the insurer or insurance group.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 2019)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 12, SLA 2019 makes this section effective July 20, 2019.